Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.545.120

New programs or grades—Approval—Rules.

(1) The superintendent of public instruction, with recommendations from the school facilities citizen advisory panel under RCW 28A.525.025, shall adopt rules governing the establishment in any existing nonhigh school district of any secondary program or any new grades in grades nine through twelve. Before any such program or any new grades are established, the district must obtain prior approval of the superintendent of public instruction.

(2) This section does not apply to innovation academy cooperatives established under RCW 28A.340.080 through 28A.340.090.

[ 2010 c 99 s 8; 2006 c 263 s 325.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2010 c 99: See note following RCW 28A.340.080.

Findings—Purpose—Part headings not law—2006 c 263: See notes following RCW 28A.150.230.